fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX wT Y 78
SFX wT tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre
SFX wT roître roissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croître
SFX wT roitre roissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wT roître rû/L'D'Q' recroître
SFX wT roître rûs/D'Q' recroître
SFX wT roître rûe/L'D'Q' recroître
SFX wT roître rûes/D'Q' recroître
SFX wT roître ru/L'D'Q' décroître
SFX wT roître rus/D'Q' décroître
SFX wT roître rue/L'D'Q' décroître
SFX wT roître rues/D'Q' décroître
SFX wT roitre ru/L'D'Q' .croitre
SFX wT roitre rus/D'Q' .croitre
SFX wT roitre rue/L'D'Q' .croitre
SFX wT roitre rues/D'Q' .croitre
SFX wT roître rois/j'n'q'l'm't' .croître
SFX wT roître roît/n'q'l'm't's' .croître
SFX wT roître roissons/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wT roître roissez/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wT roître roissent/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wT roitre rois/j'n'q'l'm't' .croitre
SFX wT roitre roit/n'q'l'm't's' .croitre
SFX wT roitre roissons/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissez/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wT roître roissais/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wT roître roissait/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wT roître roissions/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wT roître roissiez/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wT roître roissaient/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wT roitre roissais/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissait/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissions/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissiez/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissaient/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wT roître rus/j'n'q'l'm't' .croître
SFX wT roître rut/n'q'l'm't's' .croître
SFX wT roître rûmes/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wT roître rûtes/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wT roître rurent/n'q'l'm't's' .croître
SFX wT roitre rus/j'n'q'l'm't' .croitre
SFX wT roitre rut/n'q'l'm't's' .croitre
SFX wT roitre rûmes/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wT roitre rûtes/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wT roitre rurent/n'q'l'm't's' .croitre
SFX wT tre trai/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wT tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wT tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wT tre trons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX wT tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX wT tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wT tre trais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wT tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wT tre trions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX wT tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX wT tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wT roître roisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wT roître roisses/n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wT roitre roisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wT roitre roisses/n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wT roître russe/j'n'q'l'm't' .croître
SFX wT roître russes/n'q'l'm't' .croître
SFX wT roître rût/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wT roître russions/n'q'l't' .croître
SFX wT roître russiez/n'q'l'm' .croître
SFX wT roître russent/n'q'l'm't's' .croître
SFX wT roitre russe/j'n'q'l'm't' .croitre
SFX wT roitre russes/n'q'l'm't' .croitre
SFX wT roitre rût/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wT roitre russions/n'q'l't' .croitre
SFX wT roitre russiez/n'q'l'm' .croitre
SFX wT roitre russent/n'q'l'm't's' .croitre
SFX wT roître rois/n'l'm't' .croître
SFX wT roître roissons/n'l't' croître
SFX wT roître roissez/n'l'm' croître
SFX wT roitre rois/n'l'm't' .croitre
SFX wT roitre roissons/n'l't' croitre
SFX wT roitre roissez/n'l'm' croitre

SFX wU Y 30
SFX wU roître rû/L'D'Q' croître
SFX wU roître rûs/D'Q' croître
SFX wU roître rûe/L'D'Q' croître
SFX wU roître rûes/D'Q' croître
SFX wU roitre rû/L'D'Q' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûs/D'Q' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûe/L'D'Q' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûes/D'Q' croitre
SFX wU roître roîs/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wU roître roît/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wU roitre roîs/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wU roitre roît/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wU roître rûs/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wU roître rût/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wU roître rûrent/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wU roitre rûs/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wU roitre rût/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûrent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wU roître rûsse/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wU roître rûsses/n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wU roître rûssions/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wU roître rûssiez/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wU roître rûssent/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wU roitre rûsse/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûsses/n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûssions/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûssiez/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wU roitre rûssent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wU roître roîs/n'l'm't' croître
SFX wU roitre roîs/n'l'm't' croitre

SFX wV Y 74
SFX wV tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre
SFX wV croître croissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croitre croissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croître cru/L'D'Q' croître
SFX wV croître crus/D'Q' croître
SFX wV croître crue/L'D'Q' croître
SFX wV croître crues/D'Q' croître
SFX wV croitre cru/L'D'Q' croitre
SFX wV croitre crus/D'Q' croitre
SFX wV croitre crue/L'D'Q' croitre
SFX wV croitre crues/D'Q' croitre
SFX wV croître crois/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croître croît/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croître croissons/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wV croître croissez/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wV croître croissent/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croitre crois/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croitre croit/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissons/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissez/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croître croissais/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croître croissait/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croître croissions/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wV croître croissiez/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wV croître croissaient/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croitre croissais/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissait/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissions/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissiez/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissaient/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croître crus/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croître crut/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croître crûmes/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wV croître crûtes/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wV croître crurent/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croitre crus/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croitre crut/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croitre crûmes/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wV croitre crûtes/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wV croitre crurent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV tre trai/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wV tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wV tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wV tre trons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX wV tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX wV tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wV tre trais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wV tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wV tre trions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX wV tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX wV tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wV croître croisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croître croisses/n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croitre croisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croitre croisses/n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croître crusse/j'n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croître crusses/n'q'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croître crût/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croître crussions/n'q'l't' croître
SFX wV croître crussiez/n'q'l'm' croître
SFX wV croître crussent/n'q'l'm't's' croître
SFX wV croitre crusse/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croitre crusses/n'q'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croitre crût/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croitre crussions/n'q'l't' croitre
SFX wV croitre crussiez/n'q'l'm' croitre
SFX wV croitre crussent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre
SFX wV croître crois/n'l'm't' croître
SFX wV croître croissons/n'l't' croître
SFX wV croître croissez/n'l'm' croître
SFX wV croitre crois/n'l'm't' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissons/n'l't' croitre
SFX wV croitre croissez/n'l'm' croitre
